Nevada, session 83, AB540.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 319 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 to 17, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 2. As used in sections 2 to 17, inclusive, of this act,
unless the context otherwise requires, the words and terms defined
in sections 3 to 8, inclusive, of this act have the meanings ascribed
to them in those sections.
Sec. 3. “Attainable housing” has the meaning ascribed to it
in NRS 278.0105.
Sec. 4. “Attainable housing project” means any project or
program that receives a grant of money from the Nevada
Attainable Housing Account pursuant to section 10 of this act.
Sec. 5. “Council” means the Nevada Attainable Housing
Council created by section 15 of this act.
Sec. 6. “Eligible entity” means a person or entity that is
eligible to receive money from the Nevada Attainable Housing
Account in accordance with the allocation plan for attainable
housing adopted by the Administrator pursuant to section 11 of
this act. The term includes, without limitation:
1. A state agency.
2. A local government.
3. A nonprofit organization.
4. A housing authority, as defined in NRS 315.021.
5. A tribal government or agency.
6. A housing counseling agency that is certified by the United
States Department of Housing and Urban Development.
7. Any private entity that enters into a public-private
partnership with the State or a local government to offer any of
the following:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 7 –
(a) Competitive loans, grants or rebates to support the
development of attainable housing.
(b) Competitive loans, grants or rebates for the development of
attainable housing projects that qualify for federal low-income
housing tax credits, as defined in NRS 360.863.
(c) The acquisition of land for the development of attainable
housing projects.
Sec. 7. “Essential worker” means a person employed in:
1. Health care;
2. Education;
3. Public safety;
4. Construction labor; or
5. Any other industry that is a critical sector of employment
in this State, as determined by executive order of the Governor.
Sec. 8. “Nevada Attainable Housing Account” or “Account”
means the Nevada Attainable Housing Account created by section
9 of this act.
Sec. 9. 1. The Nevada Attainable Housing Account is
hereby created in the State General Fund. All money that is
collected for the use of the Account from any source must be
deposited in the Account.
2. The money in the Nevada Attainable Housing Account
must be used for the purposes described in section 10 of this act.
3. The Nevada Attainable Housing Account must be
administered by the Division. The Division may apply for and
accept any gift, grant, donation, bequest or other source of money
for deposit in the Account.
4. The interest and income earned on money in the Nevada
Attainable Housing Account, after deducting any applicable
charges, must be credited to the Account.
5. Any money remaining in the Account at the end of the
fiscal year must remain in the Account and does not revert to the
State General Fund, and the balance in the Account must be
carried forward to the next fiscal year.
Sec. 10. 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section,
money in the Account may be distributed by the Division, in
consultation with the Council, to eligible entities for expenditures
relating to attainable housing, including, without limitation, for:
(a) Competitive loans, grants or rebates to support the
development of attainable housing;
(b) Competitive loans, grants or rebates for the development of
attainable housing projects that qualify for federal low-income
housing tax credits, as defined in NRS 360.863;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 8 –
(c) Financial assistance for supportive housing;
(d) Programs for rental assistance or eviction diversion;
(e) The acquisition of land for the development of attainable
housing projects;
(f) Programs that assist essential workers to purchase homes,
including, without limitation, programs that provide down
payment assistance, interest rate buydowns or other forms of
direct financial support to essential workers for purchasing
homes;
(g) Programs that provide down payment assistance, interest
rate buydowns or other forms of direct financial support for
purchasing homes to households that have a total monthly gross
household income that is not more than 150 percent of the median
monthly gross household income for the county in which the
housing is located; and
(h) Incentives for local governments to increase the supply of
attainable housing, including, without limitation:
(1) Incentives for local governments to expedite the
approval of attainable housing projects;
(2) Reimbursing local governments for waiving or
deferring the payment of fees or taxes for attainable housing
projects that are affordable for households that have a total
monthly gross income that is not more than 150 percent of the
median monthly gross household income for the county in which
the housing is located; or
(3) Taking any other action within the authority of the local
government that increases the supply of attainable housing.
2. Any eligible entity that is a private entity that enters into a
public-private partnership with the State or a local government
may only receive money from the Account for the following:
(a) Competitive loans, grants or rebates to support the
development of attainable housing;
(b) Competitive loans, grants or rebates for the development of
attainable housing projects that qualify for federal low-income
housing tax credits, as defined in NRS 360.863; or
(c) The acquisition of land for the development of attainable
housing projects.
3. In awarding money from the Account, the Division, in
consultation with the Council:
(a) Shall prioritize projects that demonstrate the highest
potential impact on addressing the attainable housing needs of the
State, including, without limitation, prioritizing the need for
single-family homes that are affordable for households that have a
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 9 –
total monthly gross income that is not more than 150 percent of
the median monthly gross household income for the county in
which the housing is located; and
(b) May prioritize projects that:
(1) Request to purchase land owned by:
(I) The Federal Government at a discounted price for
the creation of affordable housing pursuant to federal law,
including, without limitation, the provisions of section 7(b) of the
Southern Nevada Public Land Management Act of 1998, Public
Law 105-263; or
(II) The State or a local government at a discounted rate
for the creation of attainable housing;
(2) Utilize innovative strategies for expanding the supply of
attainable housing; or
(3) Utilize cost-effective methods and efficient use of
allocated resources.
4. Any eligible entity that receives any money from the
Nevada Attainable Housing Account for an attainable housing
project shall ensure that:
(a) Only households that meet the applicable income
requirements for the attainable housing project rent or purchase,
as applicable, the units of attainable housing;
(b) Each unit of attainable housing in the attainable housing
project is used as the primary residence of the household that
rents or purchases, as applicable, the unit; and
(c) No for-profit business entity purchases a unit of the
attainable housing in the attainable housing project.
Sec. 11. 1. For each calendar year, the Administrator shall
adopt an allocation plan for disbursing money from the Nevada
Attainable Housing Account for attainable housing. A
disbursement of money from the Account must comply with the
allocation plan for the calendar year in which the disbursement is
made.
2. The allocation plan adopted pursuant to subsection 1 must,
without limitation, set forth:
(a) The application and eligibility requirements for an eligible
entity to apply for and receive money from the Nevada Attainable
Housing Account, including, without limitation, requirements for
an eligible entity to demonstrate:
(1) The necessary expertise and capacity to properly carry
out the proposed attainable housing project for which the eligible
entity receives money from the Account;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 10 –
(2) The extent to which the proposed attainable housing
project maximizes the use of money from the Account by obtaining
additional financial support from federal, local, private or other
sources; and
(3) The long-term sustainability of the proposed attainable
housing project and its potential to contribute to community
stability, foster economic development and increase access to
attainable housing.
(b) Any requirements for an eligible entity that receives money
from the Nevada Attainable Housing Account to demonstrate
compliance with any condition upon the receipt of money from the
Account.
3. Before adopting a proposed allocation plan pursuant to
subsection 1, the Administrator must:
(a) Hold at least one public hearing on the proposed allocation
plan that complies with the provisions set forth in chapter 241 of
NRS; and
(b) Make the proposed allocation plan available on the
Internet website of the Division at least 14 days before the first
public hearing held pursuant to paragraph (a).
Sec. 12. An eligible entity must provide or secure matching
funds in an amount that is not less than the amount of money
awarded to the eligible entity from the Account. Such matching
funds may come from, without limitation, private investment,
contributions from local governments or federal money.
Secs. 13 and 14. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 14.5. 1. The Division shall submit a report to the
Interim Finance Committee for consideration at the last meeting
of each fiscal year and the last meeting of each calendar year
relating to the Nevada Attainable Housing Account.
2. The report required pursuant to subsection 1 must include,
without limitation:
(a) The amount and purpose of all money awarded from the
Account during the reporting period broken down by eligible
entity and authorized use, as described in section 10 of this act;
(b) The number and the income levels of all households that
were assisted by money awarded from the Account during the
reporting period;
(c) The number of new attainable housing units that were built
in part with money from the Account during the reporting period;
(d) The number of parcels purchased in part with money from
the Account for the purposes of attainable housing projects,
broken down by geographic area of the State;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 11 –
(e) The number of households and demographic information
of recipients of rental assistance from programs for rental
assistance or eviction diversion that receive money from the
Account;
(f) The average amount of time for processing an application
for rental assistance from a program for rental assistance or
eviction diversion that received money from the Account;
(g) A description of the outcomes resulting from early
intervention efforts, including, without limitation, whether
eviction proceedings were reduced as a result of the program for
rental assistance or eviction diversion;
(h) Recommendations for improvements or adjustments to
programs for rental assistance or eviction diversion, based on the
performance data of the programs;
(i) Any other information that the Division determines is
necessary to include in the report; and
(j) Any other information requested by the Interim Finance
Committee.
Sec. 15. 1. The Nevada Attainable Housing Council is
hereby created to provide oversight and strategic guidance for the
administration and allocation of the Nevada Attainable Housing
Account.
2. The Nevada Attainable Housing Council consists of:
(a) The Director of the Department of Business and Industry
or his or her designee, who is chair of the Council;
(b) The Administrator of the Division or his or her designee;
(c) One member appointed by the Majority Leader of the
Senate;
(d) One member appointed by the Minority Leader of the
Senate;
(e) One member appointed by the Minority Leader of the
Assembly;
(f) One member appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly;
and
(g) One member appointed by the Governor.
3. Of the members appointed pursuant to paragraphs (c) to
(g), inclusive, of subsection 2:
(a) One member must have expertise in banking and the
financing of housing projects;
(b) One member must represent the builders and developers of
housing projects;
(c) One member must have expertise in the multifamily
housing industry;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 12 –
(d) One member must represent a low-income housing
organization; and
(e) One member must represent the general public.
4. Each person who is required to appoint a member
pursuant to subsection 2 must make his or her appointment from a
list of persons recommended by the Division. To the extent
practicable, the membership of the Council must represent the
geographic diversity of this State.
5. Each appointed member of the Council serves a term of 2
years and may be reappointed for additional terms of 2 years in
the same manner as the original appointments.
6. Any vacancy occurring in the appointed membership of the
Council must be filled in the same manner as the original
appointment for the remainder of the unexpired term.
7. Each appointed member of the Council:
(a) Serves without compensation; and
(b) While engaged in the business of the Council, is entitled to
receive the per diem allowance and travel expenses provided for
state officers and employees generally.
8. The Department of Business and Industry shall provide the
Council with administrative support.
Sec. 16. The Division shall establish procedures to ensure
that any member of the Council discloses any direct or indirect
financial interest in an attainable housing project or eligible
entity. Such procedures must be consistent with the provisions of
chapter 281A of NRS and any regulation adopted by the Nevada
Commission on Ethics pursuant to that chapter.
Sec. 17. The Nevada Attainable Housing Council shall:
1. Review and comment on:
(a) The annual housing progress report compiled by the
Division pursuant to NRS 278.235;
(b) The reports compiled by the Division pursuant to NRS
278.237; and
(c) The report concerning housing prepared by the Advisory
Committee on Housing pursuant to NRS 319.174; and
2. Provide recommendations to the Division regarding the
allocation and use of money from the Nevada Attainable Housing
Account pursuant to the allocation plan adopted pursuant to
section 11 of this act.
Sec. 17.3. NRS 319.141 is hereby amended to read as follows:
319.141 1. The Housing [Advocate] Liaison is hereby
created within the Division.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 13 –
2. The Administrator shall appoint a person to serve in the
position of Housing [Advocate.] Liaison. The Housing [Advocate]
Liaison is in the unclassified service of the State and serves at the
pleasure of the Administrator.
3. The person so appointed pursuant to subsection 2 must be
knowledgeable about affordable housing and manufactured housing.
4. The Housing [Advocate] Liaison shall:
(a) Respond to written and telephonic inquiries received from
residents who reside in affordable housing and manufactured
housing and provide assistance to such residents in understanding
their rights and responsibilities;
(b) Conduct community outreach and provide information
concerning housing to residents who reside in affordable housing
and manufactured housing;
(c) Identify and investigate complaints of residents of affordable
housing and manufactured housing that relate to their housing and
provide assistance to such residents to resolve the complaints;
(d) Establish and maintain a system to collect and maintain
information pertaining to written and telephonic inquiries received
by the Division; and
(e) [Any] Perform any other duties specified by the
Administrator.
5. The Administrator may remove the Housing [Advocate]
Liaison from the office for any reason not prohibited by law.
Sec. 17.6. NRS 319.143 is hereby amended to read as follows:
319.143 1. The Division shall create and maintain a statewide
low-income housing database.
2. The database must include, without limitation, the
compilation [and analysis] of demographic, economic and housing
data from a variety of sources, including, without limitation, reports
submitted pursuant to NRS 278.235 [, that:] and any survey
conducted by the Division, relating to the information that must be
included in the report required by subsection 3.
3. On or before December 31 of each year, the Division shall:
(a) [Provides for an annual assessment of] Analyze the data in
the database and prepare a report which must:
(1) Assess the affordable housing market at the city and
county level, including data relating to housing units, age of
housing, rental rates and rental vacancy rates, new home sales and
resale of homes, new construction permits, mobile homes, lots
available for mobile homes and conversions of multifamily
condominiums;
[(b) Addresses]
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 14 –
(2) Address the housing needs of various population groups
in Nevada, such as households that rent, homeowners, elderly
households, veterans, persons with disabilities or special needs,
homeless persons, recovering persons with a substance use disorder,
persons suffering from mental health ailments and victims of
domestic violence, with each group distinguished to show the
percentage of the population group at different income levels, and a
determination of the number of households within each special-
needs group experiencing housing costs greater than [50] 30 percent
of their income, overcrowding or substandard housing;
[(c) Contains]
(3) Contain an estimate of the number and condition of
subsidized and other low-income housing units at the county level
and the identification of any subsidized units that are forecast to
convert to market-rate units within a [2-year] 3-year planning
period;
[(d) Provides]
(4) Provide a demographic and economic overview by local
and county jurisdiction, if feasible, for the population of Nevada,
including age, race and ethnicity, household size, migration, current
and forecast employment, household income and a summary
relating to the effects of demographics and economic factors on
housing demand;
[(e) Provides]
(5) Provide the number of housing units available to a victim
of domestic violence from any housing authority, as defined in NRS
315.021, and from participation in the program of housing
assistance pursuant to section 8 of the United States Housing Act of
1937, 42 U.S.C. § 1437f; and
[(f) Provides]
(6) Provide the number of terminations of victims of
domestic violence in this State from the program of housing
assistance pursuant to section 8 of the United States Housing Act of
1937, 42 U.S.C. § 1437f.
[3. The costs of creating and maintaining the database:
(a) Must be paid from the Account for Affordable Housing
created by NRS 319.500; and]
(b) [May not exceed $175,000 per year.] Post the report on the
Internet website of the Division.
4. If an owner of multifamily residential housing that is offered
for rent or lease in this State and is:
(a) Accessible to persons with disabilities; and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 15 –
(b) [Affordable] Attainable housing, as defined in
NRS 278.0105,
 has received any loan, grant or contribution for the multifamily
residential housing from the Federal Government or the State, the
owner shall, not less than quarterly, report to the Division for
inclusion in the database information concerning each unit of the
multifamily residential housing that is available and suitable for use
by a person with a disability.
5. The Division shall adopt regulations to carry out the
provisions of subsection 4.
Sec. 18. NRS 319.170 is hereby amended to read as follows:
319.170 Except as otherwise provided in NRS 319.169 and
319.500 [,] and section 9 of this act, the Division may:
1. Establish such funds or accounts as may be necessary or
desirable for furtherance of the purposes of this chapter.
2. Invest or deposit its money, subject to any agreement with
bondholders or noteholders, and is not required to keep any of its
money in the State Treasury. The provisions of chapters 355 and
356 of NRS do not apply to such investments or deposits.
Sec. 18.5. NRS 319.510 is hereby amended to read as follows:
319.510 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2,
money deposited in the Account for Affordable Housing must be
used:
(a) For the acquisition, construction or rehabilitation of
affordable housing for eligible families by public or private
nonprofit charitable organizations, housing authorities or local
governments through loans, grants or subsidies;
(b) To provide technical and financial assistance to public or
private nonprofit charitable organizations, housing authorities and
local governments for the acquisition, construction or rehabilitation
of affordable housing for eligible families;
(c) To provide funding for projects of public or private nonprofit
charitable organizations, housing authorities or local governments
that provide assistance to or guarantee the payment of rent or
deposits as security for rent for eligible families, including homeless
persons;
(d) To reimburse the Division for the costs of administering the
Account;
(e) To assist eligible persons by supplementing their monthly
rent for the manufactured home lots, as defined by NRS 118B.016,
on which their manufactured homes, as defined by NRS 118B.015,
are located; [and]
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 16 –
(f) To pay the costs of creating and maintaining the statewide
low-income housing database and preparing the annual report
required by NRS 319.143;
(g) To assist families that have children and whose income is
at or below the federally designated level signifying poverty; and
(h) In any other manner consistent with this section to assist
eligible families in obtaining or keeping affordable housing,
including use as the State’s contribution to facilitate the receipt of
related federal money.
2. [Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the] The
Division may expend each fiscal year not more than:
(a) Six percent of the money [from] deposited in the Account as
reimbursement for the necessary costs of efficiently administering
the Account . [and any money received pursuant to 42 U.S.C. §§
12701 et seq. In no case may the Division expend more than
$40,000 per year or an amount equal to 6 percent of any money
made available to the State pursuant to 42 U.S.C. §§ 12701 et seq.,
whichever is greater. In addition, the Division may expend not more
than $175,000 per year from]
(b) Six percent of the money deposited in the Account to create
and maintain the statewide low-income housing database and
prepare the annual report required by NRS 319.143. [The Division
may expend not more than $75,000 per year]
(c) Seventy-five thousand dollars of the money deposited in the
Account pursuant to NRS 375.070 for the purpose set forth in
paragraph (e) of subsection 1. [Of the]
3. The remaining money allocated from the Account [:] after
the expenditures made pursuant to subsections 1 and 2
[(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, 15 percent
must be distributed to the Division of Welfare and Supportive
Services of the Department of Health and Human Services for use in
its program developed pursuant to 45 C.F.R. § 233.120, as that
section existed on December 4, 1997, to provide emergency
assistance to needy families with children, subject to the following:
(1) The Division of Welfare and Supportive Services shall
adopt regulations governing the use of the money that are consistent
with the provisions of this section.
(2) The money must be used solely for activities relating to
affordable housing that are consistent with the provisions of this
section.
(3) The money must be made available to families that have
children and whose income is at or below the federally designated
level signifying poverty.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 17 –
(4) All money provided by the Federal Government to match
the money distributed to the Division of Welfare and Supportive
Services pursuant to this section must be expended for activities
consistent with the provisions of this section.
(b) Eighty-five percent] must be distributed to public or private
nonprofit charitable organizations, housing authorities [and] or local
governments for the acquisition, construction and rehabilitation of
affordable housing for eligible families, subject to the following:
[(1)] (a) Priority may be given to those projects that provide
a preference for:
[(I)] (1) Women who are veterans;
[(II)] (2) Women who were previously incarcerated;
[(III)] (3) Survivors of domestic violence;
[(IV)] (4) Elderly women who do not have stable or
adequate living arrangements; and
[(V)] (5) Unmarried persons with primary physical
custody of a child.
[(2)] (b) Priority must be given to those projects that qualify
for the federal tax credit relating to low-income housing.
[(3)] (c) Priority must be given to those projects that
anticipate receiving federal money to match the state money
distributed to them.
[(4)] (d) Priority must be given to those projects that have
the commitment of a local government to provide assistance to
them.
[(5)] (e) All money must be used to benefit families whose
income does not exceed 120 percent of the median income for
families residing in the same county, as defined by the United States
Department of Housing and Urban Development.
[(6)] (f) Not less than 15 percent of the units acquired,
constructed or rehabilitated must be affordable to persons whose
income is at or below [the federally designated level signifying
poverty.] 30 percent of the median monthly gross household
income for the county in which the housing is located. For the
purposes of this subparagraph, a unit is affordable if a family does
not have to pay more than 30 percent of its gross income for housing
costs, including both utility and mortgage or rental costs.
[(7) To be eligible to receive money pursuant to this
paragraph, a project must be sponsored by a local government.
3. The Division may, pursuant to contract and in lieu of
distributing money to the Division of Welfare and Supportive
Services pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection 2, distribute any
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 18 –
amount of that money to private or public nonprofit entities for use
consistent with the provisions of this section.]
Sec. 19. Chapter 118A of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The Housing Division of the Department of Business and
Industry may establish a program for the reporting of rental
payments to a credit reporting agency. Any such program must be
offered at no cost to a landlord or tenant.
2. The Division may not require any landlord or tenant to
participate in such a program. A landlord shall not require any
tenant to participate in the program or subject a tenant to any
penalty or consequence for not participating in the program.
3. The Division may:
(a) Establish requirements for any landlord or tenant to
voluntarily participate in the program, including, without
limitation, any safeguard necessary to ensure that participation in
the program is voluntary and that tenants are not subject to any
adverse action for participating or not participating in the
program.
(b) Provide guidelines for the use of an independent third-
party vendor to manage the collection and reporting of rental
payments. The Division shall maintain and publish a list of third-
party vendors that are approved by the Division to manage the
reporting of rental payments pursuant to the program.
4. The Division may adopt any regulation necessary to carry
out the provisions of this section, including, without limitation:
(a) Criteria for approving an independent third-party vendor to
manage the collection and reporting of rental payments;
(b) Requirements for tenants to be notified and provide proper
consent to participate in the program; and
(c) Procedures for resolving any dispute relating to the
reporting of rental payments pursuant to the program.
Sec. 20. Chapter 118B of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The Division may establish a program for the reporting of
rental payments to a credit reporting agency. Any such program
must be offered at no cost to a landlord or tenant.
2. The Division may not require any landlord or tenant to
participate in such a program. A landlord shall not require any
tenant to participate in the program or subject a tenant to any
penalty or consequence for not participating in the program.
3. The Division may:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 19 –
(a) Establish requirements for any landlord or tenant to
voluntarily participate in the program, including, without
limitation, any safeguard necessary to ensure that participation in
the program is voluntary and that tenants are not subject to any
adverse action for participating or not participating in the
program.
(b) Provide guidelines for the use of an independent third-
party vendor to manage the collection and reporting of rental
payments. The Division shall maintain and publish a list of third-
party vendors that are approved by the Division to manage the
reporting of rental payments pursuant to the program.
4. The Division may adopt any regulations necessary to carry
out the provisions of this section, including, without limitation:
(a) Criteria for approving an independent third-party vendor to
manage the collection and reporting of rental payments;
(b) Requirements for tenants to be notified and provide proper
consent to participate in the program; and
(c) Procedures for resolving any dispute relating to the
reporting of rental payments pursuant to the program.
Sec. 21. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 22. NRS 233B.039 is hereby amended to read as follows:
233B.039 1. The following agencies are entirely exempted
from the requirements of this chapter:
(a) The Governor.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 7 and NRS
209.221 and 209.2473, the Department of Corrections.
(c) The Nevada System of Higher Education.
(d) The Office of the Military.
(e) The Nevada Gaming Control Board.
(f) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 368A.140 and 463.765,
the Nevada Gaming Commission.
(g) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 425.620, the Division
of Welfare and Supportive Services of the Department of Health and
Human Services.
(h) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 422.390, the Division
of Health Care Financing and Policy of the Department of Health
and Human Services.
(i) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 533.365, the Office of
the State Engineer.
(j) The Division of Industrial Relations of the Department of
Business and Industry acting to enforce the provisions of
NRS 618.375.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 20 –
(k) The Administrator of the Division of Industrial Relations of
the Department of Business and Industry in establishing and
adjusting the schedule of fees and charges for accident benefits
pursuant to subsection 2 of NRS 616C.260.
(l) The Board to Review Claims in adopting resolutions to carry
out its duties pursuant to NRS 445C.310.
(m) The Silver State Health Insurance Exchange.
(n) The Administrator of the Housing Division of the
Department of Business and Industry in adopting the allocation
plan pursuant to section 11 of this act.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5 and NRS
391.323, the Department of Education, the Board of the Public
Employees’ Benefits Program and the Commission on Professional
Standards in Education are subject to the provisions of this chapter
for the purpose of adopting regulations but not with respect to any
contested case.
3. The special provisions of:
(a) Chapter 612 of NRS for the adoption of an emergency
regulation or the distribution of regulations by and the judicial
review of decisions of the Employment Security Division of the
Department of Employment, Training and Rehabilitation;
(b) Chapters 616A to 617, inclusive, of NRS for the
determination of contested claims;
(c) Chapter 91 of NRS for the judicial review of decisions of the
Administrator of the Securities Division of the Office of the
Secretary of State; and
(d) NRS 90.800 for the use of summary orders in contested
cases,
 prevail over the general provisions of this chapter.
4. The provisions of NRS 233B.122, 233B.124, 233B.125 and
233B.126 do not apply to the Department of Health and Human
Services in the adjudication of contested cases involving the
issuance of letters of approval for health facilities and agencies.
5. The provisions of this chapter do not apply to:
(a) Any order for immediate action, including, but not limited
to, quarantine and the treatment or cleansing of infected or infested
animals, objects or premises, made under the authority of the State
Board of Agriculture, the State Board of Health, or any other agency
of this State in the discharge of a responsibility for the preservation
of human or animal health or for insect or pest control;
(b) An extraordinary regulation of the State Board of Pharmacy
adopted pursuant to NRS 453.2184;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 21 –
(c) A regulation adopted by the State Board of Education
pursuant to NRS 388.255 or 394.1694;
(d) The judicial review of decisions of the Public Utilities
Commission of Nevada;
(e) The adoption, amendment or repeal of policies by the
Rehabilitation Division of the Department of Employment, Training
and Rehabilitation pursuant to NRS 426.561 or 615.178;
(f) The adoption or amendment of a rule or regulation to be
included in the State Plan for Services for Victims of Crime by
the Department of Health and Human Services pursuant to
NRS 217.130;
(g) The adoption, amendment or repeal of rules governing the
conduct of contests and exhibitions of unarmed combat by the
Nevada Athletic Commission pursuant to NRS 467.075;
(h) The adoption, amendment or repeal of standards of content
and performance for courses of study in public schools by the
Council to Establish Academic Standards for Public Schools and the
State Board of Education pursuant to NRS 389.520;
(i) The adoption, amendment or repeal of the statewide plan to
allocate money from the Fund for a Resilient Nevada created by
NRS 433.732 established by the Department of Health and Human
Services pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 1 of NRS 433.734;
or
(j) The adoption or amendment of a data request by the
Commissioner of Insurance pursuant to NRS 687B.404.
6. The State Board of Parole Commissioners is subject to the
provisions of this chapter for the purpose of adopting regulations but
not with respect to any contested case.
7. The Department of Corrections is subject to the provisions
of this chapter for the purpose of adopting regulations relating to
fiscal policy, correspondence with inmates and visitation with
inmates of the Department of Corrections.
Sec. 23. NRS 244.281 is hereby amended to read as follows:
244.281 1. Except as otherwise provided in this [subsection]
section and NRS 244.189, 244.276, 244.279, 244.2815, 244.2825,
244.2833, 244.2835, 244.284, 244.287, 244.290, 278.479 to
278.4965, inclusive, and subsection 3 of NRS 496.080, except as
otherwise required by federal law, except as otherwise required
pursuant to a cooperative agreement entered into pursuant to NRS
277.050 or 277.053 or an interlocal agreement in existence on or
before October 1, 2004, except if the board of county
commissioners is entering into a joint development agreement for
real property owned by the county to which the board of county
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 22 –
commissioners is a party, except for a lease of residential property
with a term of 1 year or less, except for the sale or lease of real
property to a public utility, as defined in NRS 704.020, to be used
for a public purpose and except for the sale or lease of real property
larger than 1 acre which is approved by the voters at a primary or
general election or special election:
(a) When a board of county commissioners has determined by
resolution that the sale or lease of any real property owned by the
county will be for purposes other than to establish, align, realign,
change, vacate or otherwise adjust any street, alley, avenue or other
thoroughfare, or portion thereof, or flood control facility within the
county and will be in the best interest of the county, it may:
(1) Sell the real property in the manner prescribed for the
sale of real property in NRS 244.282.
(2) Lease the real property in the manner prescribed for the
lease of real property in NRS 244.283.
(b) Before the board of county commissioners may sell or lease
any real property as provided in paragraph (a), it shall:
(1) Post copies of the resolution described in paragraph (a) in
three public places in the county; and
(2) Cause to be published at least once a week for 3
successive weeks, in a newspaper qualified under chapter 238 of
NRS that is published in the county in which the real property is
located, a notice setting forth:
(I) A description of the real property proposed to be sold
or leased in such a manner as to identify it;
(II) The minimum price, if applicable, of the real property
proposed to be sold or leased; and
(III) The places at which the resolution described in
paragraph (a) has been posted pursuant to subparagraph (1), and any
other places at which copies of that resolution may be obtained.
 If no qualified newspaper is published within the county in which
the real property is located, the required notice must be published in
some qualified newspaper printed in the State of Nevada and having
a general circulation within that county.
(c) Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph and
paragraph (h), if the board of county commissioners by its resolution
further finds that the real property to be sold or leased is worth more
than $1,000, the board shall select two or more disinterested,
competent real estate appraisers pursuant to NRS 244.2795 to
appraise the real property. If the board of county commissioners
holds a public hearing on the matter of the fair market value of the
property, one disinterested, competent appraisal of the real property
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 23 –
is sufficient before selling or leasing it. Except for real property
acquired pursuant to NRS 371.047, the board of county
commissioners shall not sell or lease it for less than:
(1) If two independent appraisals were obtained, the average
of the appraisals of the real property.
(2) If only one independent appraisal was obtained, the
appraised value of the real property.
(d) If the real property is appraised at $1,000 or more, the board
of county commissioners may:
(1) Lease the real property; or
(2) Sell the real property either for cash or for not less than
25 percent cash down and upon deferred payments over a period of
not more than 10 years, secured by a mortgage or deed of trust,
bearing such interest and upon such further terms as the board of
county commissioners may specify.
(e) A board of county commissioners may sell or lease any real
property owned by the county without complying with the
provisions of NRS 244.282 or 244.283 to:
(1) A person who owns real property located adjacent to the
real property to be sold or leased if the board has determined by
resolution that the sale will be in the best interest of the county and
the real property is a:
(I) Remnant that was separated from its original parcel
due to the construction of a street, alley, avenue or other
thoroughfare, or portion thereof, flood control facility or other
public facility;
(II) Parcel that, as a result of its size, is too small to
establish an economically viable use by anyone other than the
person who owns real property adjacent to the real property for sale
or lease; or
(III) Parcel which is subject to a deed restriction
prohibiting the use of the real property by anyone other than the
person who owns real property adjacent to the real property for sale
or lease.
(2) The State or another governmental entity if:
(I) The sale or lease restricts the use of the real property
to a public use; and
(II) The board adopts a resolution finding that the sale or
lease will be in the best interest of the county.
(f) A board of county commissioners that disposes of real
property pursuant to paragraph (d) is not required to offer to
reconvey the real property to the person from whom the real
property was received or acquired by donation or dedication.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 24 –
(g) If real property that is offered for sale or lease pursuant to
this section is not sold or leased at the initial offering of the contract
for the sale or lease of the real property, the board of county
commissioners may offer the real property for sale or lease a second
time pursuant to this section. The board of county commissioners
must obtain a new appraisal or appraisals, as applicable, of the real
property pursuant to the provisions of NRS 244.2795 before
offering the real property for sale or lease a second time if:
(1) There is a material change relating to the title, the zoning
or an ordinance governing the use of the real property; or
(2) The appraisal or appraisals, as applicable, were prepared
more than 6 months before the date on which the real property is
offered for sale or lease the second time.
(h) If real property that is offered for sale or lease pursuant to
this section is not sold or leased at the second offering of the
contract for the sale or lease of the real property, the board of county
commissioners may list the real property for sale or lease at the
appraised value or average of the appraised value if two or more
appraisals were obtained, as applicable, with a licensed real estate
broker, provided that the broker or a person related to the broker
within the first degree of consanguinity or affinity does not have an
interest in the real property or an adjoining property. If the appraisal
or appraisals, as applicable, were prepared more than 6 months
before the date on which the real property is listed with a licensed
real estate broker, the board of county commissioners must obtain
one new appraisal of the real property pursuant to the provisions of
NRS 244.2795 before listing the real property for sale or lease at the
new appraised value.
2. Before approving the sale or lease of real property owned
by the county for the development of attainable housing, in
addition to complying with the provisions of subsection 1, the
board of county commissioners shall evaluate the capacity and
commitment of the developer to provide long-term benefits to the
county in a manner that promotes transparency and does not
interfere with equitable competition. The developer shall submit to
the board of county commissioners:
(a) Information that sets forth:
(1) The number of employees of the developer or any
affiliate of the developer who are residents of this State; and
(2) The number of households in this State who live in
attainable housing units that are owned or managed by the
developer or any affiliate of the developer;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 25 –
(b) A description of any previous project for which the
developer received federal low-income housing tax credits, as
defined in NRS 360.863, with documentation of compliance with
any federal requirements; and
(c) A description of any previous project where the developer
has obtained additional federal low-income housing tax credits, as
defined in NRS 360.863, or alternative financing for the
rehabilitation or resyndication of attainable housing. The
description must include, without limitation, the name, location,
number of units and cost per unit of the attainable housing.
3. If real property is sold or leased in violation of the
provisions of this section:
(a) The sale or lease is void; and
(b) Any change to an ordinance or law governing the zoning or
use of the real property is void if the change takes place within 5
years after the date of the void sale or lease.
[3.] 4. As used in this section [, “flood] :
(a) “Attainable housing” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 278.0105.
(b) “Flood control facility” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 244.276.
Sec. 24. NRS 244.287 is hereby amended to read as follows:
244.287 1. A nonprofit organization may submit to a board
of county commissioners an application for conveyance of property
that is owned by the county if the property was:
(a) Received by donation for the use and benefit of the county
pursuant to NRS 244.270.
(b) Purchased by the county pursuant to NRS 244.275.
2. Before the board of county commissioners makes a
determination on such an application for conveyance, it shall hold at
least one public hearing on the application. Notice of the time, place
and specific purpose of the hearing must be:
(a) Published at least once in a newspaper of general circulation
in the county.
(b) Mailed to all owners of record of real property which is
located not more than 300 feet from the property that is proposed for
conveyance.
(c) Posted in a conspicuous place on the property that is
proposed for conveyance.
 The hearing must be held not fewer than 10 days but not more
than 40 days after the notice is published, mailed and posted in
accordance with this subsection.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 26 –
3. The board of county commissioners may approve such an
application for conveyance if the nonprofit organization
demonstrates to the satisfaction of the board that the organization or
its assignee will use the property to develop [affordable] attainable
housing. An application must include, without limitation:
(a) Information that sets forth:
(1) The number of employees of the nonprofit organization
or its affiliates who are residents of this State; and
(2) The number of households in this State who live in
attainable housing units that are owned or managed by the
nonprofit organization or any affiliate of the nonprofit
organization;
(b) A description of any previous project for which the
nonprofit organization received federal low-income housing tax
credits, as defined in NRS 360.863, with documentation of
compliance with any federal requirements; and
(c) A description of any previous project where the nonprofit
organization has obtained additional federal low-income housing
tax credits, as defined in NRS 360.863, or alternative financing for
the rehabilitation or resyndication of attainable housing. The
description must include, without limitation, the name, location,
number of units and cost per unit of the attainable housing.
4. If the board of county commissioners receives more than
one application for conveyance of the property, the board must give
priority to an application of a nonprofit organization that
demonstrates to the satisfaction of the board that the organization or
its assignee will use the property to develop [affordable] attainable
housing for persons who are seniors or disabled . [or elderly.
4.] 5. If the board of county commissioners approves an
application for conveyance, it may convey the property to the
nonprofit organization without consideration. Such a conveyance
must not be in contravention of any condition in a gift or devise of
the property to the county.
[5.] 6. As a condition to the conveyance of the property
pursuant to subsection [4,] 5, the board of county commissioners
shall enter into an agreement with the nonprofit organization that
requires the nonprofit organization or its assignee to use the
property to provide [affordable] attainable housing for at least 50
years. If the nonprofit organization or its assignee fails to use the
property to provide [affordable] attainable housing pursuant to the
agreement, the board of county commissioners may take reasonable
action to return the property to use as [affordable] attainable
housing, including, without limitation:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 27 –
(a) Repossessing the property from the nonprofit organization or
its assignee.
(b) Transferring ownership of the property from the nonprofit
organization or its assignee to another person or governmental entity
that will use the property to provide [affordable] attainable housing.
[6.] 7. The agreement required by subsection [5] 6 must be
recorded in the office of the county recorder of the county in which
the property is located and must specify:
(a) The number of years for which the nonprofit organization or
its assignee must use the property to provide [affordable] attainable
housing; and
(b) The action that the board of county commissioners will take
if the nonprofit organization or its assignee fails to use the property
to provide [affordable] attainable housing pursuant to the
agreement.
[7.] 8. A board of county commissioners that has conveyed
property pursuant to subsection [4] 5 shall:
(a) Prepare annually a list which includes a description of all
property that was conveyed to a nonprofit organization pursuant to
this section; and
(b) Include the list in the annual audit of the county which is
conducted pursuant to NRS 354.624.
[8.] 9. If, 5 years after the date of a conveyance pursuant to
subsection [4,] 5, a nonprofit organization or its assignee has not
commenced construction of [affordable] attainable housing, or
entered into such contracts as are necessary to commence the
construction of [affordable] attainable housing, the property that
was conveyed automatically reverts to the county.
[9.] 10. A board of county commissioners may subordinate
the interest of the county in property conveyed pursuant to
subsection [4] 5 to a first or subsequent holder of a mortgage on that
property to the extent the board deems necessary to promote
investment in the construction of [affordable] attainable housing.
[10.] 11. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise
requires:
(a) [“Affordable] “Attainable housing” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 278.0105.
(b) “Nonprofit organization” means an organization that is
recognized as exempt pursuant to 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3).
Sec. 25. NRS 268.058 is hereby amended to read as follows:
268.058 1. A nonprofit organization may submit to the
governing body of a city an application for conveyance of property
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 28 –
that is owned by the city if the property was purchased or received
by the city pursuant to NRS 268.008.
2. Before the governing body makes a determination on such
an application for conveyance, it shall hold at least one public
hearing on the application. Notice of the time, place and specific
purpose of the hearing must be:
(a) Published at least once in a newspaper of general circulation
in the city.
(b) Mailed to all owners of record of real property which is
located not more than 300 feet from the property that is proposed for
conveyance.
(c) Posted in a conspicuous place on the property that is
proposed for conveyance.
 The hearing must be held not fewer than 10 days but not more
than 40 days after the notice is published, mailed and posted in
accordance with this subsection.
3. The governing body may approve such an application for
conveyance if the nonprofit organization demonstrates to the
satisfaction of the governing body that the organization or its
assignee will use the property to develop [affordable] attainable
housing. An application must include, without limitation:
(a) Information that sets forth:
(1) The number of employees of the nonprofit organization
or its affiliates who are residents of this State; and
(2) The number of households in this State who live in
attainable housing units that are owned or managed by the
nonprofit organization or any affiliate of the nonprofit
organization;
(b) A description of any previous project for which the
nonprofit organization received federal low-income housing tax
credits, as defined in NRS 360.863, with documentation of
compliance with any federal requirements; and
(c) A description of any previous project where the nonprofit
organization has obtained additional federal low-income housing
tax credits, as defined in NRS 360.863, or alternative financing for
the rehabilitation or resyndication of attainable housing. The
description must include, without limitation, the name, location,
number of units and cost per unit of the attainable housing.
4. If the governing body receives more than one application for
conveyance of the property, the governing body must give priority
to an application of a nonprofit organization that demonstrates to the
satisfaction of the governing body that the organization or its
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 29 –
assignee will use the property to develop [affordable] attainable
housing for persons who are seniors or disabled . [or elderly.
4.] 5. If the governing body approves an application for
conveyance, it may convey the property to the nonprofit
organization without consideration. Such a conveyance must not be
in contravention of any condition in a gift or devise of the property
to the city.
[5.] 6. As a condition to the conveyance of the property
pursuant to subsection [4,] 5, the governing body shall enter into an
agreement with the nonprofit organization that requires the
nonprofit organization or its assignee to use the property to provide
[affordable] attainable housing for at least 50 years. If the nonprofit
organization or its assignee fails to use the property to provide
[affordable] attainable housing pursuant to the agreement, the
governing body may take reasonable action to return the property to
use as [affordable] attainable housing, including, without limitation:
(a) Repossessing the property from the nonprofit organization or
its assignee.
(b) Transferring ownership of the property from the nonprofit
organization or its assignee to another person or governmental entity
that will use the property to provide [affordable] attainable housing.
[6.] 7. The agreement required by subsection [5] 6 must be
recorded in the office of the county recorder of the county in which
the property is located and must specify:
(a) The number of years for which the nonprofit organization or
its assignee must use the property to provide [affordable] attainable
housing; and
(b) The action that the governing body will take if the nonprofit
organization or its assignee fails to use the property to provide
[affordable] attainable housing pursuant to the agreement.
[7.] 8. A governing body that has conveyed property pursuant
to subsection [4] 5 shall:
(a) Prepare annually a list which includes a description of all
property conveyed to a nonprofit organization pursuant to this
section; and
(b) Include the list in the annual audit of the city which is
conducted pursuant to NRS 354.624.
[8.] 9. If, 5 years after the date of a conveyance pursuant to
subsection [4,] 5, a nonprofit organization or its assignee has not
commenced construction of [affordable] attainable housing, or
entered into such contracts as are necessary to commence the
construction of [affordable] attainable housing, the property that
was conveyed automatically reverts to the city.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 30 –
[9.] 10. A governing body may subordinate the interest of the
city in property conveyed pursuant to subsection [4] 5 to a first or
subsequent holder of a mortgage on that property to the extent the
governing body deems necessary to promote investment in the
construction of [affordable] attainable housing.
[10.] 11. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise
requires:
(a) [“Affordable] “Attainable housing” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 278.0105.
(b) “Nonprofit organization” means an organization that is
recognized as exempt pursuant to 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3).
Sec. 26. NRS 268.061 is hereby amended to read as follows:
268.061 1. Except as otherwise provided in this [subsection]
section and NRS 268.048 to 268.058, inclusive, 268.063, 268.064,
278.479 to 278.4965, inclusive, and subsection 4 of NRS 496.080,
except as otherwise provided by federal law, except as otherwise
required pursuant to a cooperative agreement entered into pursuant
to NRS 277.050 or 277.053 or an interlocal agreement in existence
on October 1, 2004, except if the governing body is entering into a
joint development agreement for real property owned by the city to
which the governing body is a party, except for a lease of residential
property with a term of 1 year or less, except for the sale or lease of
real property to a public utility, as defined in NRS 704.020, to be
used for a public purpose and except for the sale or lease of real
property larger than 1 acre which is approved by the voters at a
primary or general election, primary or general city election or
special election:
(a) If a governing body has determined by resolution that the
sale or lease of any real property owned by the city will be in the
best interest of the city, it may sell or lease the real property in
the manner prescribed for the sale or lease of real property in
NRS 268.062.
(b) Before the governing body may sell or lease any real
property as provided in paragraph (a), it shall:
(1) Post copies of the resolution described in paragraph (a) in
three public places in the city; and
(2) Cause to be published at least once a week for 3
successive weeks, in a newspaper qualified under chapter 238 of
NRS that is published in the county in which the real property is
located, a notice setting forth:
(I) A description of the real property proposed to be sold
or leased in such a manner as to identify it;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 31 –
(II) The minimum price, if applicable, of the real property
proposed to be sold or leased; and
(III) The places at which the resolution described in
paragraph (a) has been posted pursuant to subparagraph (1), and any
other places at which copies of that resolution may be obtained.
 If no qualified newspaper is published within the county in which
the real property is located, the required notice must be published in
some qualified newspaper printed in the State of Nevada and having
a general circulation within that county.
(c) If the governing body by its resolution finds additionally that
the real property to be sold is worth more than $1,000, the
governing body shall, as applicable, conduct an appraisal or
appraisals pursuant to NRS 268.059 to determine the value of the
real property. Except for real property acquired pursuant to NRS
371.047, the governing body shall not sell or lease it for less than:
(1) If two independent appraisals were obtained, the average
of the appraisals of the real property.
(2) If only one independent appraisal was obtained, the
appraised value of the real property.
(d) If the real property is appraised at $1,000 or more, the
governing body may:
(1) Lease the real property; or
(2) Sell the real property for:
(I) Cash; or
(II) Not less than 25 percent cash down and upon deferred
payments over a period of not more than 10 years, secured by a
mortgage or deed of trust bearing such interest and upon such
further terms as the governing body may specify.
(e) A governing body may sell or lease any real property owned
by the city without complying with the provisions of this section
and NRS 268.059 and 268.062 to:
(1) A person who owns real property located adjacent to the
real property to be sold or leased if the governing body has
determined by resolution that the sale or lease will be in the best
interest of the city and the real property is a:
(I) Remnant that was separated from its original parcel
due to the construction of a street, alley, avenue or other
thoroughfare, or portion thereof, flood control facility or other
public facility;
(II) Parcel that, as a result of its size, is too small to
establish an economically viable use by anyone other than the
person who owns real property adjacent to the real property offered
for sale or lease; or
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 32 –
(III) Parcel which is subject to a deed restriction
prohibiting the use of the real property by anyone other than the
person who owns real property adjacent to the real property offered
for sale or lease.
(2) The State or another governmental entity if:
(I) The sale or lease restricts the use of the real property
to a public use; and
(II) The governing body adopts a resolution finding that
the sale or lease will be in the best interest of the city.
(f) A governing body that disposes of real property pursuant to
paragraph (e) is not required to offer to reconvey the real property to
the person from whom the real property was received or acquired by
donation or dedication.
(g) If real property that is offered for sale or lease pursuant to
this section is not sold or leased at the initial offering of the contract
for the sale or lease of the real property, the governing body may
offer the real property for sale or lease a second time pursuant to this
section. The governing body must obtain a new appraisal or
appraisals, as applicable, of the real property pursuant to the
provisions of NRS 268.059 before offering the real property for sale
or lease a second time if:
(1) There is a material change relating to the title, zoning or
an ordinance governing the use of the real property; or
(2) The appraisal or appraisals, as applicable, were prepared
more than 6 months before the date on which the real property is
offered for sale or lease the second time.
(h) If real property that is offered for sale or lease pursuant to
this section is not sold or leased at the second offering of the
contract for the sale or lease of the real property, the governing body
may list the real property for sale or lease at the appraised value or
average of the appraised value if two or more appraisals were
obtained, as applicable, with a licensed real estate broker, provided
that the broker or a person related to the broker within the first
degree of consanguinity or affinity does not have an interest in the
real property or an adjoining property. If the appraisal or appraisals,
as applicable, were prepared more than 6 months before the date on
which the real property is listed with a licensed real estate broker,
the governing body must obtain one new appraisal of the real
property pursuant to the provisions of NRS 268.059 before listing
the real property for sale or lease at the new appraised value.
2. Before approving the sale or lease of real property owned
by the city for the development of attainable housing, as defined in
NRS 278.0105, in addition to complying with the provisions of
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 33 –
subsection 1, the governing body shall evaluate the capacity and
commitment of the developer to provide long-term benefits to the
city in a manner that promotes transparency and does not
interfere with equitable competition. The developer shall submit to
the governing body:
(a) Information that sets forth:
(1) The number of employees of the developer or any
affiliate of the developer who are residents of this State; and
(2) The number of households in this State who live in
attainable housing units that are owned or managed by the
developer or any affiliate of the developer;
(b) A description of any previous project for which the
developer received federal low-income housing tax credits, as
defined in NRS 360.863, with documentation of compliance with
any federal requirements; and
(c) A description of any previous project where the developer
has obtained additional federal low-income housing tax credits, as
defined in NRS 360.863, or alternative financing for the
rehabilitation or resyndication of attainable housing. The
description must include, without limitation, the name, location,
number of units and cost per unit of the attainable housing.
3. If real property is sold or leased in violation of the
provisions of this section:
(a) The sale or lease is void; and
(b) Any change to an ordinance or law governing the zoning or
use of the real property is void if the change takes place within 5
years after the date of the void sale or lease.
Sec. 27. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 28. Chapter 278 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 29 to 31, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 29. 1. “Tier five affordable housing” means housing
for a household:
(a) Which has a total monthly gross income that is equal to
more than 120 percent but not more than 150 percent of the
median monthly gross household income for the county in which
the housing is located; and
(b) Which costs not more than 30 percent of the total monthly
gross household income of a household whose income equals 150
percent of the median monthly gross household income for the
county in which the housing is located, including the cost of
utilities.
2. For purposes of this section:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 34 –
(a) Median monthly gross household income must be
determined based upon the estimates of the United States
Department of Housing and Urban Development of the most
current median gross family income for the county in which the
housing is located; and
(b) The cost of housing for a household determined pursuant
to paragraph (b) of subsection 1 may be offset by cost savings to
the household of energy efficiency measures.
Sec. 29.5. 1. “Tier one affordable housing” means housing
for a household:
(a) Which has a total monthly gross income that is equal to not
more than 30 percent of the median monthly gross household
income for the county in which the housing is located; and
(b) Which costs not more than 30 percent of the total monthly
gross household income of a household whose income equals 30
percent of the median monthly gross household income for the
county in which the housing is located, including the cost of
utilities.
2. For purposes of this section:
(a) Median monthly gross household income must be
determined based upon the estimates of the United States
Department of Housing and Urban Development of the most
current median gross family income for the county in which the
housing is located; and
(b) The cost of housing for a household determined pursuant
to paragraph (b) of subsection 1 may be offset by cost savings to
the household of energy efficiency measures.
Sec. 30. 1. Each governing body of a county or city shall
enact by ordinance:
(a) An expedited process for the consideration and approval of
projects for attainable housing in the county or city, as applicable.
Such expedited process must prioritize, to the extent practicable,
the processing of projects for attainable housing in the county or
city, as applicable, over all other projects and allow deviation from
the current process for the consideration and approval of projects
for attainable housing. Any such deviation includes, without
limitation, authorizing the administrative approval for any
applications relating to attainable housing projects by a person
authorized by the governing body.
(b) Incentives for the development of projects for attainable
housing in the county or city, as applicable, that encourage the
use of the expedited process required pursuant to paragraph (a).
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 35 –
2. As used in this section, “attainable housing” has the
meaning ascribed to it in NRS 278.0105.
Sec. 31. 1. Each reviewing agency shall adopt a process for
the expedited review of and comment on a tentative map pursuant
to NRS 278.330 to 278.3485, inclusive, that prioritizes the review
of and comment on tentative maps that include attainable housing.
2. The expedited process adopted pursuant to subsection 1
must, without limitation, comply with the applicable provisions of
NRS 278.330 to 278.3485, inclusive.
3. If the reviewing agency is not able to use the expedited
process adopted pursuant to subsection 1 for the expedited review
of and comment on a tentative map, the reviewing agency must:
(a) Document the specific reasons why the use of the expedited
process is not possible, including, without limitation, any
deficiency with the tentative map;
(b) Notify the subdivider of the specific reasons documented
pursuant to paragraph (a) and provide the subdivider with an
estimated date on which the reviewing agency will complete its
review of and comment on the tentative map; and
(c) Complete the review of and comment on a tentative map as
soon as possible and not later than any deadline set forth in NRS
278.330 to 278.3485, inclusive, for the reviewing agency to review
and comment on a tentative map not subject to the expedited
process.
4. As used in this section, “reviewing agency” means any
state agency, local government or quasi-governmental entity that
is required to review tentative maps pursuant to NRS 278.330 to
278.3485, inclusive. The term includes, without limitation:
(a) The Division of Water Resources of the State Department
of Conservation and Natural Resources;
(b) The Division of Environmental Protection of the State
Department of Conservation and Natural Resources;
(c) The Public Utilities Commission of Nevada and any utility,
person or other entity that is regulated by the Commission;
(d) The Department of Wildlife;
(e) The Board of Wildlife Commissioners;
(f) A district board of health;
(g) A public water system;
(h) A planning commission;
(i) An irrigation district;
(j) The governing body of a county;
(k) The governing body of a city;
(l) The board of trustees of a school district; and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 36 –
(m) The board of trustees of a general improvement district.
Sec. 32. NRS 278.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
278.010 As used in NRS 278.010 to 278.630, inclusive, and
sections 29 to 31, inclusive, of this act, unless the context otherwise
requires, the words and terms defined in NRS 278.0103 to
278.0195, inclusive, and sections 29 and 29.5 of this act have the
meanings ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 33. NRS 278.0105 is hereby amended to read as follows:
278.0105 [“Affordable] “Attainable housing” means tier one
affordable housing, tier two affordable housing , [or] tier three
affordable housing [.] , tier four affordable housing or tier five
affordable housing.
Sec. 34. NRS 278.01902 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
278.01902 1. “Tier [one] two affordable housing” means
housing for a household:
(a) Which has a total monthly gross income that is equal to more
than 30 percent but not more than 60 percent of the median
monthly gross household income for the county in which the
housing is located; and
(b) Which costs not more than 30 percent of the total monthly
gross household income of a household whose income equals 60
percent of the median monthly gross household income for the
county in which the housing is located, including the cost of
utilities.
2. For purposes of this section [, median] :
(a) Median gross household income must be determined based
upon the estimates of the United States Department of Housing and
Urban Development of the most current median gross family
income for the county in which the housing is located [.] ; and
(b) The costs of housing for a household determined pursuant
to paragraph (b) of subsection 1 may be offset by the cost savings
to the household of energy efficiency measures.
Sec. 35. NRS 278.01904 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
278.01904 1. “Tier [three] four affordable housing” means
housing for a household:
(a) Which has a total monthly gross income that is equal to more
than 80 percent but not more than 120 percent of the median
monthly gross household income for the county in which the
housing is located; and
(b) Which costs not more than 30 percent of the total monthly
gross household income of a household whose income equals 120
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 37 –
percent of the median monthly gross household income for the
county in which the housing is located, including the cost of
utilities.
2. For purposes of this section [, median] :
(a) Median gross household income must be determined based
upon the estimates of the United States Department of Housing and
Urban Development of the most current median gross family
income for the county in which the housing is located [.] ; and
(b) The costs of housing for a household determined pursuant
to paragraph (b) of subsection 1 may be offset by the cost savings
to the household of energy efficiency measures.
Sec. 36. NRS 278.01906 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
278.01906 1. “Tier [two] three affordable housing” means
housing for a household:
(a) Which has a total monthly gross income that is equal to more
than 60 percent but not more than 80 percent of the median monthly
gross household income for the county in which the housing is
located; and
(b) Which costs not more than 30 percent of the total monthly
gross household income of a household whose income equals 80
percent of the median monthly gross household income for the
county in which the housing is located, including the cost of
utilities.
2. For purposes of this section [, median] :
(a) Median gross household income must be determined based
upon the estimates of the United States Department of Housing and
Urban Development of the most current median gross family
income for the county in which the housing is located [.] ; and
(b) The costs of housing for a household determined pursuant
to paragraph (b) of subsection 1 may be offset by the cost savings
to the household of energy efficiency measures.
Sec. 37. NRS 278.235 is hereby amended to read as follows:
278.235 1. If the governing body of a city or county is
required to include the housing element in its master plan pursuant
to NRS 278.150, the governing body, in carrying out the plan for
maintaining and developing [affordable] attainable housing to meet
the housing needs of the community, which is required to be
included in the housing element pursuant to subparagraph (8) of
paragraph (c) of subsection 1 of NRS 278.160, shall adopt at least
six of the following measures:
(a) Reducing , [or] subsidizing or reimbursing, in whole or in
part impact fees, fees for the issuance of building permits collected
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 38 –
pursuant to NRS 278.580 and fees imposed for the purpose for
which an enterprise fund was created.
(b) Selling land owned by the city or county, as applicable, to
developers exclusively for the development of [affordable]
attainable housing at not more than 10 percent of the appraised
value of the land, and requiring that any such savings, subsidy or
reduction in price be passed on to the purchaser of housing in such a
development. Nothing in this paragraph authorizes a city or county
to obtain land pursuant to the power of eminent domain for the
purposes set forth in this paragraph.
(c) Donating land owned by the city or county to a nonprofit
organization to be used for [affordable] attainable housing.
(d) Leasing land by the city or county to be used for [affordable]
attainable housing.
(e) Requesting to purchase land owned by the Federal
Government at a discounted price for the creation of [affordable]
attainable housing pursuant to the provisions of section 7(b) of the
Southern Nevada Public Land Management Act of 1998, Public
Law 105-263.
(f) Establishing a trust fund for [affordable] attainable housing
that must be used for the acquisition, construction or rehabilitation
of [affordable] attainable housing.
(g) Establishing a process that expedites the approval of plans
and specifications relating to maintaining and developing
[affordable] attainable housing.
(h) Providing money, support or density bonuses for
[affordable] attainable housing developments that are financed,
wholly or in part, with low-income housing tax credits, private
activity bonds or money from a governmental entity for [affordable]
attainable housing, including, without limitation, money received
pursuant to 12 U.S.C. § 1701q and 42 U.S.C. § 8013.
(i) Providing financial incentives or density bonuses to promote
appropriate transit-oriented or multi-story housing developments
that would include an [affordable] attainable housing component.
(j) Offering density bonuses or other incentives to encourage the
development of [affordable] attainable housing.
(k) Providing direct financial assistance to qualified applicants
for the purchase or rental of [affordable] attainable housing.
(l) Providing money for supportive services necessary to enable
persons with supportive housing needs to reside in [affordable]
attainable housing in accordance with a need for supportive housing
identified in the 5-year consolidated plan adopted by the United
States Department of Housing and Urban Development for the city
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 39 –
or county pursuant to 42 U.S.C. § 12705 and described in 24 C.F.R.
Part 91.
2. A governing body may reduce , [or] subsidize or reimburse
impact fees, fees for the issuance of building permits or fees
imposed for the purpose for which an enterprise fund was created to
assist in maintaining or developing a project for [affordable]
attainable housing, pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection 1, only
if:
(a) [When the incomes of all the residents of the project for
affordable housing are averaged, the housing would be affordable
on average for a family with a total gross income that does not
exceed 60 percent of the median gross income for the county
concerned based upon the estimates of the United States Department
of Housing and Urban Development of the most current median
gross family income for the county.
(b) The governing body has adopted an ordinance that
establishes the criteria that a project for affordable housing must
satisfy to receive assistance in maintaining or developing the project
for affordable housing. Such criteria must be designed to put into
effect all relevant elements of the master plan adopted by the
governing body pursuant to NRS 278.150.
(c) The project for affordable housing satisfies the criteria set
forth in the ordinance adopted pursuant to paragraph (b).
(d)] The governing body makes a determination that reducing ,
[or] subsidizing or reimbursing such fees will not impair adversely
the ability of the governing body to pay, when due, all interest and
principal on any outstanding bonds or any other obligations for
which revenue from such fees was pledged.
[(e)] (b) The governing body holds a public hearing concerning
the effect of the reduction , [or] subsidization or reimbursement of
such fees on the economic viability of the general fund of the city or
county, as applicable, and, if applicable, the economic viability of
any affected enterprise fund.
3. On or before [July] March 15 of each year, the governing
body shall submit to the Housing Division of the Department of
Business and Industry a report, in the form prescribed by the
Housing Division, of how the measures adopted pursuant to
subsection 1 assisted the city or county in maintaining and
developing [affordable] attainable housing to meet the needs of the
community for the preceding year. The report must include an
analysis of the need for [affordable] attainable housing within the
city or county that exists at the end of the reporting period. The
governing body shall cooperate with the Housing Division to ensure
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 40 –
that the information contained in the report is appropriate for
inclusion in, and can be effectively incorporated into, the statewide
low-income housing database created pursuant to NRS 319.143.
4. On or before [August] April 15 of each year, the Housing
Division shall compile the reports submitted pursuant to subsection
3 and post the compilation on the Internet website of the Housing
Division.
Sec. 37.2. NRS 349.294 is hereby amended to read as follows:
349.294 All moneys received from the issuance of any
securities herein authorized shall be used solely for the purpose or
purposes for which issued and to defray wholly or in part the cost of
the project thereby delineated [.] , including, without limitation,
any proceeds received from the general obligation bonds issued
pursuant to section 49.7 of this act. Any accrued interest and any
premium shall be applied to the cost of the project or to the payment
of the interest on or the principal of the securities, or both interest
and principal, or shall be deposited in a reserve therefor, or any
combination thereof, as the Commission may determine.
Sec. 37.5. NRS 375.070 is hereby amended to read as follows:
375.070 1. The county recorder shall transmit the proceeds of
the tax imposed by NRS 375.020 at the end of each quarter in the
following manner:
(a) An amount equal to that portion of the proceeds which is
equivalent to 10 cents for each $500 of value or fraction thereof
must be transmitted to the State Controller who shall deposit that
amount in the Account for Affordable Housing created pursuant to
NRS 319.500.
(b) In a county whose population is 700,000 or more, an amount
equal to that portion of the proceeds which is equivalent to 60 cents
for each $500 of value or fraction thereof must be transmitted to the
county treasurer for deposit in the county school district’s fund for
capital projects established pursuant to NRS 387.328, to be held and
expended in the same manner as other money deposited in that fund.
(c) The remaining proceeds must be transmitted to the State
Controller for deposit in the Local Government Tax Distribution
Account created by NRS 360.660 for credit to the respective
accounts of Carson City and each county.
2. In addition to any other authorized use of the proceeds it
receives pursuant to subsection 1, a county or city may use the
proceeds to pay expenses related to or incurred for the development
of tier one affordable housing , [and] tier two affordable housing [.] ,
tier three affordable housing and tier four affordable housing. A
county or city that uses the proceeds in that manner must give
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 41 –
priority to the development of tier one affordable housing , [and] tier
two affordable housing , tier three affordable housing and tier four
affordable housing for persons who are elderly or persons with
disabilities.
3. The expenses authorized by subsection 2 include, but are not
limited to:
(a) The costs to acquire land and developmental rights;
(b) Related predevelopment expenses;
(c) The costs to develop the land, including the payment of
related rebates;
(d) Contributions toward down payments made for the purchase
of affordable housing; and
(e) The creation of related trust funds.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Tier one affordable housing” has the meaning ascribed to it
in [NRS 278.01902.] section 29.5 of this act.
(b) “Tier two affordable housing” has the meaning ascribed to it
in NRS [278.01906.] 278.01902.
(c) “Tier three affordable housing” has the meaning ascribed
to it in NRS 278.01906.
(d) “Tier four affordable housing” has the meaning ascribed
to it in NRS 278.01904.
Sec. 38. Chapter 624 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 39 and 40 of this act.
Sec. 39. 1. The Board shall issue a contractor’s license by
endorsement to an applicant who:
(a) Submits to the Board proof of a contractual agreement to
perform work on an attainable housing project in a rural area for
which a contractor’s license is required;
(b) Holds a valid and unrestricted contractor’s license in the
District of Columbia or any state or territory of the United States
and the Board determines that the qualifications for that
contractor’s license are substantially similar to the requirements
for the issuance of a contractor’s license in this State;
(c) Has held the contractor’s license described in paragraph
(a) for at least 4 consecutive years;
(d) Has not been disciplined by the corresponding regulatory
authority of the District of Columbia or any state or territory of the
United States in which the applicant currently holds or has held a
contractor’s license;
(e) Does not have pending any disciplinary action concerning
his or her contractor’s license in the District of Columbia or any
state or territory of the United States;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 42 –
(f) Submits to the Board a complete set of his or her
fingerprints and written permission authorizing the regulatory
body to forward the fingerprints to the Central Repository for
Nevada Records of Criminal History for submission to the Federal
Bureau of Investigation for its report or proof that the applicant
has previously passed a comparable criminal background check;
and
(g) Submits to the Board the statement required by
NRS 425.520.
2. The Board shall approve or deny an application for a
contractor’s license by endorsement submitted pursuant to this
section not more than 60 days after the receipt of a completed
application, including, without limitation, evidence that the
applicant meets the requirements set forth in subsection 1.
3. The Board shall not charge any fee in connection with a
contractor’s license by endorsement issued pursuant to this
section.
4. Before issuing a contractor’s license by endorsement
pursuant to this section, the Board shall require that the applicant
comply with the requirements set forth in NRS 624.256 and
624.270.
5. A person who obtains a contractor’s license by
endorsement pursuant to this section:
(a) May only perform work relating to an attainable housing
project in a rural area of the State; and
(b) Shall not perform any other work in this State unless the
person obtains a contractor’s license in this State.
6. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections 4 and 7 of
NRS 624.3015, a person who meets the requirements of
paragraphs (b) to (e), inclusive, of subsection 1, may submit a bid
on an attainable housing project or enter into a contractual
agreement to perform work on an attainable housing project in a
rural area for which a contractor’s license is required.
7. An applicant for a contractor’s license by endorsement
shall not perform any work on an attainable housing project until
the Board has issued the applicant the contractor’s license by
endorsement.
8. A contractor’s license by endorsement issued pursuant to
this section expires on December 31, 2029.
9. The Board shall adopt any regulation necessary to carry
out the provisions of this section.
10. As used in this section:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 43 –
(a) “Attainable housing project” has the meaning ascribed to
it in section 4 of this act.
(b) “Rural area” means:
(1) Any county whose population is less than 100,000;
(2) Any city in a county whose population is less than
100,000; or
(3) Any city whose population is less than 60,000 in a
county whose population is 100,000 or more.
Sec. 40. 1. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, if the Director of the Department of Business and
Industry determines that there is a shortage of skilled labor or
licensed contractors in a rural area of this State that is adversely
impacting the availability of attainable housing for essential
workers who are employed in the rural area, the Director may
issue a declaration of such shortage. No declaration of shortage
may be in effect for more than 3 years.
2. Upon the issuance of a declaration pursuant to subsection
1, the Board shall implement a process to issue provisional
contractors’ licenses to any applicant who:
(a) Submits to the Board proof of a contractual agreement to
perform work on an attainable housing project in a rural area for
which a contractor’s license is required;
(b) Successfully passes an examination prescribed by the
Board relating to Nevada-specific construction standards or
otherwise demonstrates knowledge and experience of Nevada-
specific construction standards;
(c) Holds a valid and unrestricted contractor’s license in the
District of Columbia or any state or territory of the United States
and the Board determines that the qualifications for that
contractor’s license are substantially similar to the requirements
for the issuance of a contractor’s license in this State;
(d) Has held the contractor’s license described in paragraph
(a) for at least 3 consecutive years;
(e) Has not been disciplined by the corresponding regulatory
authority of the District of Columbia or any state or territory of the
United States in which the applicant currently holds or has held a
contractor’s license;
(f) Does not have pending any disciplinary action concerning
his or her contractor’s license in the District of Columbia or any
state or territory of the United States;
(g) Submits to the Board a complete set of his or her
fingerprints and written permission authorizing the regulatory
body to forward the fingerprints to the Central Repository for
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 44 –
Nevada Records of Criminal History for submission to the Federal
Bureau of Investigation for its report or proof that the applicant
has previously passed a comparable criminal background check;
and
(h) Submits to the Board the statement required by
NRS 425.520.
3. The Board shall not charge any fee in connection with a
provisional contractor’s license issued pursuant to this section.
4. The Board shall approve or deny an application for a
provisional contractor’s license submitted pursuant to this section
not more than 60 days after the receipt of a completed application,
including, without limitation, evidence that the applicant meets the
requirements set forth in subsection 2.
5. Before issuing a provisional contractor’s license pursuant
to this section, the Board shall require that the applicant complies
with the requirements set forth in NRS 624.256 and 624.270.
6. A person who obtains a provisional contractor’s license
pursuant to this section:
(a) May only perform work relating to an attainable housing
project in the rural area of the State described in the declaration
issued by the Director of the Department of Business and Industry
pursuant to subsection 1; and
(b) Shall not perform any other work in this State for which a
contractor’s license is required unless the person obtains a
contractor’s license in this State.
7. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections 4 and 7 of
NRS 624.3015, a person who meets the requirements of
paragraphs (b) to (e), inclusive, of subsection 1, may submit a bid
on an attainable housing project or enter into a contractual
agreement to perform work on an attainable housing project in a
rural area for which a contractor’s license is required.
8. An applicant for a contractor’s license by endorsement
shall not perform any work on an attainable housing project until
the Board has issued the applicant the contractor’s license by
endorsement.
9. A provisional contractor’s license issued pursuant to this
section expires on December 31, 2029.
10. The Board shall adopt any regulation necessary to carry
out the provisions of this section.
11. As used in this section:
(a) “Attainable housing” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 278.0105.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 45 –
(b) “Attainable housing project” has the meaning ascribed to
it in section 4 of this act.
(c) “Essential worker” has the meaning ascribed to it in
section 7 of this act.
(d) “Rural area” means:
(1) Any county whose population is less than 100,000;
(2) Any city in a county whose population is less than
100,000; or
(3) Any city whose population is less than 60,000 in a
county whose population is 100,000 or more.
Sec. 41. NRS 624.240 is hereby amended to read as follows:
624.240 1. [Under] Except as otherwise provided in section
39 or 40 of this act, under reasonable regulations adopted by the
Board, the Board may investigate, classify and qualify applicants for
contractors’ licenses by written or oral examinations, or both, and
may issue contractors’ licenses to qualified applicants. The
examinations may, in the discretion of the Board, be given in
specific classifications only.
2. If a natural person passes the technical examination given by
the Board on or after July 1, 1985, to qualify for a classification
established pursuant to this chapter, demonstrates to the Board the
degree of experience and knowledge required in the regulations of
the Board, and is granted a license, the person is qualified for a
master’s license, if issued by any political subdivision, in the
classification for which the examination was given, if the
examination required the person to demonstrate his or her
knowledge and ability to:
(a) Utilize and understand;
(b) Direct and supervise work in compliance with; and
(c) Perform and apply any calculations required to ensure that
work performed is in compliance with,
 the applicable codes, standards and regulations.
3. If a natural person qualified for a license before July 1, 1985,
in accordance with NRS 624.260 in a trade for which a master’s
license is required by any political subdivision, and if the license is
active on or after July 1, 1985, and if the person so qualified wishes
to obtain a master’s license, the person must pass either the
appropriate examination given by the Board on or after July 1, 1985,
in accordance with NRS 624.260 and the regulations of the Board,
or the examination given by the political subdivision in the trade for
which a master’s license is required.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 46 –
Sec. 42. NRS 624.250 is hereby amended to read as follows:
624.250 1. To obtain or renew a license, an applicant must
submit to the Board an application in writing containing:
(a) The statement that the applicant desires the issuance of a
license under the terms of this chapter.
(b) The street address or other physical location of the
applicant’s place of business.
(c) The name of a person physically located in this State for
service of process on the applicant.
(d) The street address or other physical location in this State
and, if different, the mailing address, for service of process on the
applicant.
(e) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (f) or (g), the
names and physical and mailing addresses of any owners, partners,
officers, directors, members and managerial personnel of the
applicant.
(f) If the applicant is a corporation, the names and physical and
mailing addresses of the president, secretary, treasurer, any officers
responsible for contracting activities in this State, any officers
responsible for renewing the license of the applicant, any persons
used by the applicant to qualify pursuant to NRS 624.260 and any
other persons required by the Board.
(g) If the applicant is a limited-liability company, the names and
physical and mailing addresses of any managers or members with
managing authority, any managers or members responsible for
contracting activities in this State, any managers or members
responsible for renewing the license of the applicant, any persons
used by the applicant to qualify pursuant to NRS 624.260 and any
other persons required by the Board.
(h) Any information requested by the Board to ascertain the
background, financial responsibility, experience, knowledge and
qualifications of the applicant.
(i) All information required to complete the application.
2. The application must be:
(a) Made on a form prescribed by the Board in accordance with
the rules and regulations adopted by the Board.
(b) [Accompanied] Except as otherwise provided in this
paragraph, accompanied by the application fee fixed by this
chapter. If the Director of the Department of Business and
Industry issues a declaration of shortage pursuant to section 40 of
this act, the Board shall not charge any application fee in
connection with obtaining or renewing any contractor’s license in
a rural area until the declaration of shortage is no longer in effect.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 47 –
3. The Board shall include on an application form for the
issuance or renewal of a license, a method for allowing an applicant
to make a monetary contribution to the Construction Education
Account created pursuant to NRS 624.580. The application form
must state in a clear and conspicuous manner that a contribution to
the Construction Education Account is voluntary and is in addition
to any fees required for licensure. If the Board receives a
contribution from an applicant, the Board shall deposit the
contribution with the State Treasurer for credit to the Construction
Education Account.
4. [Before] Except as otherwise provided in this subsection,
before issuing a license to any applicant, the Board shall require the
applicant to pay the license fee fixed by this chapter and, if
applicable, any assessment required pursuant to NRS 624.470. If the
Director of the Department of Business and Industry issues a
declaration of shortage pursuant to section 40 of this act, the
Board shall not charge any license fee to an applicant in a rural
area until the declaration of shortage is no longer in effect.
5. As used in this section, “rural area” has the meaning
ascribed to it in section 40 of this act.
Sec. 43. NRS 624.253 is hereby amended to read as follows:
624.253 1. A licensee may make application for
classification and be classified in one or more classifications if the
licensee meets the qualifications prescribed by the Board for such
additional classification or classifications.
2. [An] Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, an
additional application and license fee may be charged for qualifying
or classifying a licensee in additional classifications. If the Director
of the Department of Business and Industry issues a declaration of
shortage pursuant to section 40 of this act, the Board shall not
charge any additional application and license fee for qualifying or
classifying a licensee in additional classifications in a rural area
until the declaration of shortage is no longer in effect.
3. As used in this section, “rural area” has the meaning
ascribed to it in section 40 of this act.
Sec. 44. NRS 624.265 is hereby amended to read as follows:
624.265 1. An applicant for a contractor’s license or a
licensed contractor, each officer, director, partner and associate
thereof, and any person who qualifies on behalf of the applicant
pursuant to subsection 2 of NRS 624.260 must possess good
character. Lack of character may be established by showing that the
applicant or licensed contractor, any officer, director, partner or
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 48 –
associate thereof, or any person who qualifies on behalf of the
applicant has:
(a) Committed any act which would be grounds for the denial,
suspension or revocation of a contractor’s license;
(b) A bad reputation for honesty and integrity;
(c) Entered a plea of guilty, guilty but mentally ill or nolo
contendere to, been found guilty or guilty but mentally ill of, or
been convicted, in this State or any other jurisdiction, of a crime
arising out of, in connection with or related to the activities of such
person in such a manner as to demonstrate his or her unfitness to act
as a contractor, and the time for appeal has elapsed or the judgment
of conviction has been affirmed on appeal; or
(d) Had a license revoked or suspended for reasons that would
preclude the granting or renewal of a license for which the
application has been made.
2. Upon the request of the Board, an applicant for a
contractor’s license, any officer, director, partner or associate of the
applicant and any person who qualifies on behalf of the applicant
pursuant to subsection 2 of NRS 624.260 must submit to the Board
completed fingerprint cards and a form authorizing an investigation
of the applicant’s background and the submission of the fingerprints
to the Central Repository for Nevada Records of Criminal History
and the Federal Bureau of Investigation. The fingerprint cards and
authorization form submitted must be those that are provided to the
applicant by the Board. The applicant’s fingerprints may be taken by
an agent of the Board or an agency of law enforcement.
3. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 239.0115, the Board
shall keep the results of the investigation confidential and not
subject to inspection by the general public.
4. The Board shall establish by regulation the fee for
processing the fingerprints to be paid by the applicant. [The] Except
as otherwise provided in this subsection, the fee must not exceed
the sum of the amounts charged by the Central Repository for
Nevada Records of Criminal History and the Federal Bureau of
Investigation for processing the fingerprints. If the Director of the
Department of Business and Industry issues a declaration of
shortage pursuant to section 40 of this act, the Board shall not
charge a fee for processing the fingerprints of an applicant for a
contractor’s license in a rural area or any officer, director, partner
or associate of the applicant or any person who qualifies on behalf
of the applicant until the declaration of shortage is no longer in
effect.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 49 –
5. The Board may obtain records of a law enforcement agency
or any other agency that maintains records of criminal history,
including, without limitation, records of:
(a) Arrests;
(b) Guilty and guilty but mentally ill pleas;
(c) Sentencing;
(d) Probation;
(e) Parole;
(f) Bail;
(g) Complaints; and
(h) Final dispositions,
 for the investigation of a licensee or an applicant for a
contractor’s license.
6. As used in this section, “rural area” has the meaning
ascribed to it in section 40 of this act.
Sec. 45. NRS 624.281 is hereby amended to read as follows:
624.281 1. [If] Except as otherwise provided in this section,
if an applicant wishes to have a license issued in an expedited
manner, the applicant must pay a fee for an application equal to two
times the amount of the fee regularly paid for an application
pursuant to subsection 1 of NRS 624.280.
2. [The] Except as otherwise provided in this section, the
applicant must pay one-half of the fee required pursuant to
subsection 1 when submitting the application and the other one-half
of the fee when the Board issues the license.
3. [In] Except as otherwise provided in this section, in
addition to the fee required pursuant to subsection 1, the applicant
shall reimburse the Board for the actual costs and expenses incurred
by the Board in processing the application.
4. If the Director of the Department of Business and Industry
issues a declaration of shortage pursuant to section 40 of this act,
the Board shall not charge an applicant in a rural area any fee
pursuant to subsection 1 or for the costs and expenses incurred by
the Board, as described in subsection 3, in processing the
application until the declaration of shortage is no longer in effect.
5. The Board shall adopt regulations prescribing the procedures
for making an application pursuant to this section.
6. As used in this section, “rural area” has the meaning
ascribed to it in section 40 of this act.
Sec. 46. NRS 624.283 is hereby amended to read as follows:
624.283 1. [Each] Except as otherwise provided in sections
39 and 40 of this act, each license issued under the provisions of
this chapter expires 2 years after the date on which it is issued,
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 50 –
except that the Board may by regulation prescribe shorter or longer
periods and prorated fees to establish a system of staggered biennial
renewals. Any license which is not renewed on or before the date for
renewal is automatically suspended.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, a license may
be renewed by submitting to the Board:
(a) An application for renewal;
(b) [The] Except as otherwise provided in subsection 7, the fee
for renewal fixed by the Board;
(c) Any assessment required pursuant to NRS 624.470 if the
holder of the license is a residential contractor as defined in NRS
624.450; and
(d) All information required to complete the renewal.
3. The Board may require a licensee to demonstrate financial
responsibility at any time through the submission of:
(a) A financial statement that is:
(1) Prepared by an independent certified public accountant;
or
(2) Submitted on a form or in a format prescribed by the
Board together with an affidavit which verifies the accuracy of the
financial statement; and
(b) If the licensee performs residential construction, such
additional documentation as the Board deems appropriate.
4. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, if a license is
automatically suspended pursuant to subsection 1, the licensee may
have the license reinstated upon filing an application for renewal
within 6 months after the date of suspension and paying, in addition
to the fee for renewal, a fee for reinstatement fixed by the Board, if
the licensee is otherwise in good standing and there are no
complaints pending against the licensee. If the licensee is otherwise
not in good standing or there is a complaint pending, the Board shall
require the licensee to provide a current financial statement prepared
by an independent certified public accountant or establish other
conditions for reinstatement. An application for renewal must be
accompanied by all information required to complete the renewal. A
license which is not reinstated within 6 months after it is
automatically suspended may be cancelled by the Board, and a new
license may be issued only upon application for an original
contractor’s license.
5. If a license is automatically suspended pursuant to
subsection 1 while the licensee was on active duty as a member of
the Armed Forces of the United States, a reserve component thereof
or the National Guard, the licensee may submit an application to the
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 51 –
Board requesting the reinstatement of his or her license without the
imposition of any penalty, punishment or disciplinary action
authorized by the provisions of this chapter. The Board may
reinstate the license if:
(a) The application for reinstatement is submitted while the
licensee is serving in the Armed Forces of the United States, a
reserve component thereof or the National Guard; and
(b) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 6, the application
for reinstatement is accompanied by an affidavit setting forth the
dates of service of the licensee and the fee for renewal fixed by the
Board pursuant to subsection 2.
6. The Board may waive the fee for renewal of a license for a
licensee specified in subsection 5 if:
(a) The license was valid at the time the licensee was called to
active duty in the Armed Forces of the United States, a reserve
component thereof or the National Guard; and
(b) The licensee provides written documentation satisfactory to
the Board substantiating his or her claim of service on active duty in
the Armed Forces of the United States, a reserve component thereof
or the National Guard.
7. If the Director of the Department of Business and Industry
issues a declaration of shortage pursuant to section 40 of this act,
the Board shall not charge an applicant for renewal in a rural
area or an applicant for reinstatement in a rural area whose
license was automatically suspended pursuant to subsection 1 any
fee for renewal or reinstatement until the declaration of shortage
is no longer in effect.
8. As used in this section, “rural area” has the meaning
ascribed to it in section 40 of this act.
Sec. 47. Section 9 of this act is hereby amended to read as
follows:
Sec. 9. 1. The Nevada Attainable Housing Account is
hereby created in the State General Fund. All money that is
collected for the use of the Account from any source must be
deposited in the Account.
2. The money in the Nevada Attainable Housing
Account must be used for the purposes described in section
10 of this act.
3. The Nevada Attainable Housing Account must be
administered by the Division. The Division may apply for and
accept any gift, grant, donation, bequest or other source of
money for deposit in the Account.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 52 –
4. The interest and income earned on money in the
Nevada Attainable Housing Account, after deducting any
applicable charges, must be credited to the Account.
5. [Any] Except as otherwise provided in subsection 6,
any money remaining in the Account at the end of the fiscal
year must remain in the Account and does not revert to the
State General Fund, and the balance in the Account must be
carried forward to the next fiscal year.
6. At the end of each fiscal year, any money in the
Account that exceeds $133,000,000 must be transferred to
the State General Fund.
Sec. 48. 1. The State Contractors’ Board shall adopt any
regulation necessary to carry out the provisions of section 39 of this
act before January 1, 2026.
2. On or before December 31, 2028, the Board shall submit a
report to the Governor and the Director of the Legislative Counsel
Bureau for transmittal to the 85th Session of the Legislature that,
without limitation:
(a) Evaluates the impact in rural areas on workforce mobility,
local businesses and economic development that can be attributed to
the issuance of contractor’s licenses by endorsement pursuant to
section 39 of this act; and
(b) Provides recommendations relating to whether the
requirement for the Board to issue contractor’s licenses by
endorsement pursuant to section 39 of this act should be continued,
modified or terminated.
Sec. 49. 1. The State Contractors’ Board shall adopt any
regulation necessary to carry out the provisions of section 40 of this
act before January 1, 2026.
2. On or before December 31, 2028, the Board shall submit a
report to the Governor and the Director of the Legislative Counsel
Bureau for transmittal to the 85th Session of the Legislature that,
without limitation:
(a) Evaluates the impact in rural areas on attainable housing,
local businesses and economic development that can be attributed to
the issuance of provisional contractor’s licenses pursuant to section
40 of this act; and
(b) Provides recommendations relating to whether the
requirement for the Board to issue provisional contractor’s licenses
pursuant to section 40 of this act should be continued, modified or
terminated.
Sec. 49.5. 1. Each governing body of a city or county shall
submit to the Housing Division of the Department of Business and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 53 –
Industry the report required pursuant to subsection 3 of NRS
278.235, as that section existed on June 30, 2025, on or before
July 15, 2025.
2. On or before August 15, 2025, the Housing Division shall
compile the reports required pursuant to subsection 1 and post the
compilation on the Internet website of the Housing Division, as
required pursuant to NRS 278.235, as that section existed on
June 30, 2025.
3. As used in this section, “governing body” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 278.015.
Sec. 49.7. 1. The State Board of Finance shall issue general
obligation bonds of the State of Nevada in the face amount of not
more than $50,000,000 in the 2025-2027 biennium, the proceeds of
which must be deposited in the Nevada Attainable Housing
Infrastructure Account created by subsection 2 and used by the
Housing Division of the Department of Business and Industry to
make loans for the development or construction of a project:
(a) That will serve attainable housing that is located in a special
improvement district or special assessment district; and
(b) For which not less than 85 percent of the total cost of
developing or constructing the infrastructure will be paid from
assessments levied within the district, or by the applicant, or any
combination thereof.
2. The Nevada Attainable Housing Infrastructure Account is
hereby created in the State General Fund. All money that is
collected for the use of the Account from any source must be
deposited in the Account. The Account must be administered by the
Housing Division.
3. The proceeds of any bonds issued pursuant to subsection 1
that are deposited in the Nevada Attainable Housing Infrastructure
Account must be used for the purposes set forth in subsection 1.
4. Interest and income earned on money in the Nevada
Attainable Housing Infrastructure Account, after deducting any
applicable charges, must be credited to the Account.
5. Any money remaining in the Nevada Attainable Housing
Infrastructure Account at the end of the fiscal year must remain in
the Account and does not revert to the State General Fund, and the
balance in the Account must be carried forward to the next fiscal
year.
6. The Housing Division shall adopt regulations to carry out its
duties set forth in subsection 1 and for the administration of the
Nevada Attainable Housing Infrastructure Account, but such
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 54 –
regulations must not authorize the use of any proceeds from the
bonds issued pursuant to subsection 1 for forgivable loans.
7. Each calendar year, if the uncommitted balance in the
Nevada Attainable Housing Infrastructure Account exceeds
$1,000,000, the Administrator of the Housing Division shall create
an allocation plan for disbursing the money in the Account. The
allocation plan must prioritize projects that are committed to longer
periods of affordability and that serve households that have a total
monthly gross income that is more than 80 percent but not more
than 120 percent of the median monthly gross household income for
the county in which the attainable housing is located.
8. Before adopting a proposed allocation plan pursuant to
subsection 7, the Administrator of the Housing Division must:
(a) Hold at least one public hearing on the proposed allocation
plan that complies with the provisions set forth in chapter 241 of
NRS; and
(b) Make the proposed allocation plan available on the Internet
website of the Housing Division at least 14 days before the first
public hearing held pursuant to paragraph (a).
9. The adoption of an allocation plan pursuant to subsection 7
must comply with the regulations adopted pursuant to subsection 6
but is not subject to the requirements of chapter 233B of NRS.
10. A disbursement of money from the Nevada Attainable
Housing Infrastructure Account pursuant to this section must be in
the form of a loan and must comply with the allocation plan for the
calendar year in which the disbursement is made. Any project that
receives a loan must serve households whose income does not
exceed the income levels established in the allocation plan for that
calendar year and must remain affordable for a period of not less
than 20 years or a longer period, as established by regulation or
contract.
11. The Housing Division shall submit an annual report to the
Interim Finance Committee that sets forth:
(a) For each loan made from the Nevada Attainable Housing
Infrastructure Account during the reporting period:
(1) The amount and purpose of the loan;
(2) The location and description of the project for which the
loan was made; and
(3) The number and the income levels of all households that
are or will be served by the project;
(b) Any other information that the Housing Division determines
is necessary to include in the report; and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 55 –
(c) Any other information requested by the Interim Finance
Committee.
12. A governing body, an applicant, any contractor who is
awarded or enters into an agreement to perform the construction
work on a project, and any subcontractor who performs any portion
of the construction work on the project shall comply with the
provisions of NRS 338.013 to 338.090, inclusive, in the same
manner as if the governing body had undertaken the project or
awarded the contract, only with respect to construction work funded
through a special improvement district or special assessment district.
13. As used in this section:
(a) “Attainable housing” has the meaning ascribed to it in
section 3 of this act.
(b) “Applicant” means the owners of all of the assessable
property within a proposed special improvement district or special
assessment district who have entered into a written agreement with a
governing body pursuant to subsection 1 of NRS 271.710.
(c) “Governing body” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 271.115.
(d) “Proceeds” means amounts received from the sale of an
issue of the general obligation bonds and any accrued interest
thereon.
(e) “Project” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 271.175.
Sec. 50. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Nevada Attainable Housing Account created by section
9 of this act the sum of $133,000,000.
Sec. 50.5. 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of this act,
the Housing Division of the Department of Business and Industry
shall include in the initial allocation plan adopted pursuant to
section 11 of this act the following allocations of money from the
Nevada Attainable Housing Account:
(a) The amount of $83,000,000 to be distributed to eligible
entities for any combination of the following:
(1) Competitive loans, grants or rebates to support the
development of attainable housing;
(2) Competitive loans, grants or rebates for the development
of attainable housing projects that qualify for federal low-income
housing tax credits, as defined in NRS 360.863; and
(3) The acquisition of land for the development of attainable
housing projects;
(b) The amount of $25,000,000 to be distributed to eligible
entities for programs that assist essential workers to purchase
homes, including, without limitation, programs that provide down
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 56 –
payment assistance, interest rate buydowns or other forms of direct
financial support to essential workers for purchasing homes;
(c) The amount of $25,000,000 to be distributed to eligible
entities for incentives for local governments to increase the supply
of attainable housing, including, without limitation:
(1) Incentives for local governments to expedite the approval
of attainable housing projects;
(2) Reimbursing local governments for waiving or deferring
the payment of fees or taxes for attainable housing projects that are
affordable for households that have a total monthly gross income
that is not more than 150 percent of the median monthly gross
household income for the county in which the housing is located; or
(3) Taking any other action within the authority of the local
government that increases the supply of attainable housing.
2. The provisions of section 12 of this act apply to any eligible
entity that receives a disbursement of money from the Nevada
Attainable Housing Account pursuant to this section.
3. The Division shall include in the reports required pursuant to
section 14.5 of this act information about the disbursements of
money from the Nevada Attainable Housing Account required
pursuant to this section.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Attainable housing” has the meaning ascribed to it in
section 3 of this act.
(b) “Attainable housing project” has the meaning ascribed to it
in section 4 of this act.
(c) “Eligible entity” has the meaning ascribed to it in section 6
of this act.
(d) “Essential worker” has the meaning ascribed to it in section
7 of this act.
(e) “Nevada Attainable Housing Account” means the Account
created by section 9 of this act.
Sec. 50.6. The Legislative Counsel shall, in preparing
supplements to the Nevada Administrative Code, appropriately
change any references to an officer, agency or other entity whose
name is changed or whose responsibilities are transferred pursuant
to the provisions of this act to refer to the appropriate officer,
agency or other entity.
Sec. 50.8. 1. Any administrative regulations adopted by an
officer or an agency whose name has been changed or whose
responsibilities have been transferred pursuant to the provisions of
this act to another officer or agency remain in force until amended
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 57 –
by the officer or agency to which the responsibility for the adoption
of the regulations has been transferred.
2. Any contracts or other agreements entered into by an officer
or agency whose name has been changed or whose responsibilities
have been transferred pursuant to the provisions of this act to
another officer or agency are binding upon the officer or agency to
which the responsibility for the administration of the provisions of
the contract or other agreement has been transferred. Such contracts
and other agreements may be enforced by the officer or agency to
which the responsibility for the enforcement of the provisions of the
contract or other agreement has been transferred.
3. Any action taken by an officer or agency whose name has
been changed or whose responsibilities have been transferred
pursuant to the provisions of this act to another officer or agency
remains in effect as if taken by the officer or agency to which the
responsibility for the enforcement of such actions has been
transferred.
Sec. 51. The provisions of NRS 218D.380 do not apply to any
provision of this act which adds or revises a requirement to submit a
report to the Legislature.
Sec. 52. The provisions of NRS 354.599 do not apply to any
additional expenses of a local government that are related to the
provisions of this act.
Sec. 53. 1. This section and sections 51 and 52 of this act
become effective upon passage and approval.
2. Sections 1 to 46, inclusive, 48, 49, 49.5, 49.7, 50.5, 50.6 and
50.8 of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On July 1, 2025, for all other purposes.
3. Section 50 of this act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
4. Sections 39 to 46, inclusive, of this act expire by limitation
on December 31, 2029.
5. Section 47 of this act becomes effective on January 1, 2030.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)